Illinois, session 104th, HB3782.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prior Authorization Reform Act is amended 5by changing Section 65 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 200/65)7    Sec. 65. Length of prior authorization approval for 8treatment for chronic health or long-term conditions. A 9chronic health condition is a condition that is expected to 10last one year or more and: (1) requires ongoing medical 11attention to effectively manage the condition or prevent an 12adverse health event; or (2) limits one or more activities of 13daily living. If a health insurance issuer requires a prior 14authorization for a recurring health care service or 15maintenance medication for the treatment of a health chronic 16or long-term condition, the approval shall remain valid for 17the lesser of 12 months from the date the health care 18professional or health care provider receives the prior 19authorization approval for the duration of the chronic health 20condition or the length of the treatment, as determined by the 21patient's health care professional, unless the standard of 22treatment for that health condition changes. This Section 23shall not apply to the prescription of benzodiazepines or   HB3782- 2 -LRB104 09217 BAB 19274 b1Schedule II narcotic drugs, such as opioids. Except to the 2extent required by medical exceptions processes for 3prescription drugs set forth in Section 45.1 of the Managed 4Care Reform and Patient Rights Act, nothing in this Section 5shall require a policy to cover any care, treatment, or 6services for any health condition that the terms of coverage 7otherwise completely exclude from the policy's covered 8benefits without regard for whether the care, treatment, or 9services are medically necessary.10(Source: P.A. 102-409, eff. 1-1-22.)